Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.285

Involuntary dissolution.

A corporation may be dissolved by decree of the superior court in an action filed on petition of the attorney general upon a showing that:

(1) The corporation procured its articles of incorporation through fraud; or

(2) The corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law.

[ 1982 c 35 s 140; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 57.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.